Georgia, session 2025_26, SB291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 40-2-86.1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to special license
plates promoting or supporting certain worthy agencies, funds, or nonprofit corporations and
S. B. 291
- 1 -

LC 39 4711S (SCS)
qualified motor vehicles or drivers with proceeds deposited into the general fund, is amended
in subsection (l) by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(12) A special license plate displaying an image of the American flag, and the words
'America First' to represent patriotism, a commitment to prioritize the interests of this
nation above all else, and to reinforce a sense of national pride and unity.
Notwithstanding subsection (h) of this Code section, the department shall be authorized
to issue such license plate prior to receipt of 1,000 prepaid applications; provided,
however, that, if 1,000 applications have not been submitted prior to January 1, 2028, the
department shall not continue to manufacture such license plate. The funds raised by the
sale of this special license plate shall be deposited in the general fund.
(13) A special license plate recognizing the importance of organ donation. The design
of the special plate shall include the phrase 'Organ Donors Save Lives.' Notwithstanding
subsection (h) of this Code section, the department shall be authorized to issue such
license plate prior to receipt of 1,000 prepaid applications; provided, however, that, if
1,000 applications have not been submitted prior to January 1, 2028, the department shall
not continue to manufacture such license plate. The funds raised by the sale of this special
license plate shall be deposited in the general fund."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 291
- 2 -